Missouri, session 2026, SB900.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 1.205, RSMo, is repealed and two new
sections enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as sections 1.205
and 376.1211, to read as follows:
1.205. 1. The general assembly of this state finds
that:
(1) The life of each human being begins at conception;
(2) Unborn children have protectable interests in
life, health, and well-being;
(3) The natural parents of unborn children have
protectable interests in the life, health, and well-being of
their unborn child.
2. Effective January 1, 1988, the laws of this state
shall be interpreted and construed to acknowledge on behalf
of the unborn child at every stage of development, all the
rights, privileges, and immunities available to other
persons, citizens, and residents of this state, subject only
to the Constitution of the United States, and decisional
interpretations thereof by the United States Supreme Court
and specific provisions to the contrary in the statutes and
constitution of this state.

SB 900 2
3. As used in this section, the term "unborn children"
or "unborn child" shall include all unborn child or children
or the offspring of human beings from the moment of
conception until birth at every stage of biological
development, but shall not apply to human embryos created
through assisted reproductive technology, including, but not
limited to, in vitro fertilization, prior to successful
implantation in the uterus.
4. Nothing in this section shall be interpreted as
creating a cause of action against a woman for indirectly
harming her unborn child by failing to properly care for
herself or by failing to follow any particular program of
prenatal care.
376.1211. 1. As used in this section, the following
terms shall mean:
(1) "Health benefit plan", the same meaning given to
the term in section 376.1350;
(2) "Infertility", a disease, condition, or status
characterized by:
(a) The inability to achieve a successful pregnancy
based on a patient's medical, sexual, and reproductive
history; age; physical findings; diagnostic testing; or any
combination thereof;
(b) The need for medical intervention, such as the use
of donor gametes or donor embryos, to achieve a successful
pregnancy either as an individual or with a partner; or
(c) An inability to conceive or sustain a successful
pregnancy after regular, unprotected sexual intercourse for:
a. Twelve months for women under thirty-five years of
age; or
b. Six months for women thirty-five years of age or
older.

SB 900 3
2. No health benefit plan providing coverage for more
than twenty-five employees that provides pregnancy-related
benefits shall be delivered, issued for delivery, continued,
amended, or renewed in this state on or after January 1,
2027, unless the plan includes coverage for the diagnosis
and treatment of infertility. Coverage shall include, but
is not limited to, in vitro fertilization, embryo transfer,
artificial insemination, and medically necessary oocyte
cryopreservation for patients undergoing medical treatments
known to cause significant impairment of fertility, such as
chemotherapy.
3. Coverage for in vitro fertilization shall be
required under this section only if:
(1) The covered individual has been unable to achieve
or sustain a successful pregnancy through less costly,
medically appropriate infertility treatments covered under
the health benefit plan;
(2) The covered individual has not undergone four
completed oocyte retrievals, except that if a live birth
follows a completed oocyte retrieval, two additional oocyte
retrievals shall be covered; and
(3) The procedures are performed at facilities that
conform to the guidelines for in vitro fertilization clinics
issued by the American College of Obstetricians and
Gynecologists or to the minimal standards for in vitro
fertilization programs issued by the American Society for
Reproductive Medicine.
4. Any individual who meets the requirements for
coverage under subsection 2 of this section for any
procedure other than in vitro fertilization shall not be
required to meet any other conditions for approval of such
coverage.

SB 900 4
5. Coverage for the procedures specified in this
section is not required in any health benefit plan issued to
or by a religious institution or organization, or to or by
an entity sponsored by a religious institution or
organization, that finds the procedures to violate its
religious and moral teachings and beliefs.
✓